Alabama, session 2026rs, SB150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 12-19-310, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§12-19-310
(a) In addition to the docket fees now authorized by
law, additional docket fees shall be assessed in all circuit,
district, and municipal courts as follows:
(1) In civil cases in the circuit and district courts,
except child support cases and as further provided for small
Page 1

except child support cases and as further provided for small
SB150 INTRODUCED
claims cases, an additional docket fee of forty-five dollars
($45) and in small claims cases an additional docket fee of
fifteen dollars ($15).
(2) In criminal cases in the circuit, district, and
municipal courts, except juvenile cases and as further
provided for traffic cases, an additional docket fee of forty
dollars ($40) and in traffic cases, but excluding parking
violations, an additional docket fee of twenty-six dollars
($26).
(b)(1) Two dollars ($2) of the traffic docket fee shall
be distributed to the Police Officers' Annuity Fund before any
distribution pursuant to subsections (c) and (d).
(2) Ten dollars ($10) of each fee in municipal court
shall be retained by the presiding municipal judge or the
municipal court clerk for operation of the municipal court
and, deposited into the State General Fund before any
distribution in subsections (c) and (d)., distributed to the
municipality for the operation of the municipal courts.
(c) There is established in the State Treasury the
State Judicial Administration Fund. Two-thirds of the docket
fees collected pursuant to subsection (a) shall be distributed
to the fund and used by the Administrative Office of Courts as
determined by the Administrative Director of Courts for the
operation of courts in this state.
(d) There is established in each judicial circuit of
this state the Presiding Circuit Judge's Judicial
Administration Fund and in each county in this state the
Circuit Clerk's Judicial Administration Fund. One-sixth of the
Page 2

Circuit Clerk's Judicial Administration Fund. One-sixth of the
SB150 INTRODUCED
docket fees collected in each circuit pursuant to subsection
(a) shall be distributed to the Presiding Circuit Judge's
Judicial Administration Fund in the circuit. One-sixth of the
docket fees collected in each county pursuant to subsection
(a) shall be distributed to the Circuit Clerk's Judicial
Administration Fund in the county.
(e)(1) The funds distributed pursuant to subsection (d)
shall be expended for the support of local court operations,
including, but not limited to, salaries and benefits of court
employees where necessary for the efficient operations of the
courts in the circuit and for other expenses as individually
determined necessary by the presiding circuit judge or any
circuit clerk to promote efficient administration of justice.
Funds distributed pursuant to subsection (d) shall not reduce
the amount payable to the presiding circuit judge or any
circuit clerk under any local act or general act or reduce or
affect the amounts of funding allocated by the Administrative
Office of Courts to the budget of the presiding circuit judge
or any circuit clerk.
(2) In addition to subdivision (1) relating to the
circuit clerk, each clerk, at his or her discretion, may use
the money in the Circuit Clerk's Judicial Administration Fund
for the purpose of awarding merit and promotions raises to
full-time employees of the clerk's office.
(f) All expenditures of funds pursuant to this section
shall be audited as all other state funds are audited.
(g) The docket fees assessed pursuant to this section
shall not be waived or remitted by the court unless all docket
Page 3

shall not be waived or remitted by the court unless all docket
SB150 INTRODUCED
fees associated with the case are waived or remitted.
(h) The court clerk shall distribute the fees provided
for in this section on a monthly basis as other costs and fees
are distributed."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4